Vermont, session 2025-2026, S38.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamp Act.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Nature faces a catastrophic loss of biodiversity, both locally and
globally.
(2) In addition to the value it has for its own sake, biodiversity is
essential to human survival.
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 2 of 14
(3) The 2017 Vermont Forest Action Plan found that fragmentation and
parcelization represent major threats to forest health and productivity and
exacerbate the impacts of climate change.
(4) The 2021 Vermont Climate Assessment highlights an increase in
extreme weather events such as droughts and floods as a significant impact of
climate change in Vermont and recommends nature-based solutions as a
proven, low-cost strategy for climate adaptation and resilience.
(5) The initial Vermont Climate Action Plan calls for investing in
strategic conservation to increase the pace of permanent conservation towards
30 by 30 targets, with Vermont Conservation Design guiding prioritization of
efforts.
(6) The Nature Conservancy has developed the Resilient and Connected
Landscapes project and found that Vermont plays a key role in the
conservation of biodiversity regionally.
(7) The Staying Connected Initiative is an international partnership of
public and private organizations. Its goal is to maintain, enhance, and restore
landscape connectivity for wide-ranging mammals across the Northern
Appalachians-Acadian region, from the Adirondack Mountains to the Maritime
Provinces. The Staying Connected Initiative has identified nine linkages
across this vast region that are extremely important to wildlife. Six of these
linkages lie within Vermont.
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 3 of 14
(8) Vermont’s most effective and efficient contribution to conserving
biological diversity and maintaining a landscape resilient to climate change is,
first, to conserve an intact and connected landscape and, second, to create and
protect connections in the landscape.
(9) Given the threats of biodiversity loss, landscape fragmentation, and
climate change, the General Assembly should conserve lands in the State to
increase landscape connectivity.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. chapter 104 is added to read:
CHAPTER 104. HABITAT CORRIDOR CONSERVATION
§ 4201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Amenable land” means an area of land that the State may acquire
and use for habitat corridors or wildlife crossings.
(2) “Habitat corridor” means an area of land, including wildlife
crossings, that connect at least two habitats, including land meant to facilitate
the movement of wildlife or designated to connect wildlife habitats.
(3) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(4) “Take” means:
(A) pursuing, shooting, hunting, killing, capturing, trapping, harming,
snaring, or netting wildlife;
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 4 of 14
(B) an act intended to create a risk of injury to wildlife, whether or
not injury occurs, including harassing; wounding; or placing, setting, drawing,
or using any net or other device used to take wildlife; or
(C) attempting to engage in or assisting another to engage in an act
set forth under subdivision (A) or (B) of this subdivision (4).
(5) “Wildlife” means all living sentient creatures, including fishes,
amphibians, reptiles, and insects, that are not human beings and are not
domestic animals, domestic fowl, or domestic pets.
(6) “Wildlife crossing” means infrastructure that connects two or more
wildlife habitats, including infrastructure meant to:
(A) facilitate the safe movement of wildlife over or beneath roads,
waters, and other barriers to wildlife movement;
(B) connect wildlife habitats;
(C) reduce wildlife-vehicle collisions;
(D) reduce the likelihood of injuries and mortalities to humans and
wildlife from wildlife-vehicle collisions; or
(E) reduce the potential for damage to motor vehicles from wildlife-
vehicle collisions.
§ 4202. CONSERVATION VISION AND GOAL
(a) The vision of the State of Vermont is to maintain an ecologically
functional landscape that sustains biodiversity, facilitates wildlife’s migratory
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 5 of 14
behaviors, encourages landscape connectivity, reduces wildlife-vehicle
collisions, and promotes climate resiliency.
(b) It is the goal of the State to increase landscape connectivity. Increases
in landscape connectivity under this chapter may qualify as ecological reserve
areas, biodiversity conservation areas, or natural resource management areas as
defined under section 2801 of this title to satisfy the goal of the State under
section 2802 of this title. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall lead the
efforts in achieving this goal. The land conserved shall include State, federal,
municipal, and private land acquired by donation, assignment, lease, fee
purchase, conservation easement, or other means of transfer.
§ 4203. AMENABLE LAND INVENTORY
(a) The Secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation
where appropriate, shall conduct and create an inventory of Vermont’s
amenable lands to serve as the basis of meeting the conservation goals of
Vermont Conservation Design and to meet the goal established in section 4202
of this title. The inventory shall be submitted for review to the House
Committees on Environment; on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry;
and on Transportation and the Senate Committees on Natural Resources and
Energy, on Agriculture, and on Transportation.
(b) The inventory shall include:
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 6 of 14
(1) an assessment of how State lands will be used to increase landscape
connectivity, including habitat corridors and wildlife crossings;
(2) the implementation methods that could be utilized for achieving the
goals of this chapter using Vermont Conservation Design as a guide;
(3) a review of how aquatic systems are currently conserved or
otherwise protected in the State, including a description of the benefits land
conservation provides for aquatic systems, whether this is sufficient to
maintain aquatic system functions and services, and how the implementation
methods for achieving the goals of this chapter using Vermont Conservation
Design as a guide would include specific strategies for protecting aquatic
system health;
(4) an assessment of existing funding sources that will be needed for
acquisition of land, purchase, stewardship of conservation easements, staffing
capacity, and long-term stewardship of habitat corridors and wildlife crossings
acquired under this chapter; and
(5) an assessment of which lands may be acquired under this chapter for
habitat corridors and wildlife crossings, including lands acquired by donation,
assignment, lease, fee purchase, conservation easement, or other means of
transfer.
(c) The Secretary shall update the amenable land inventory required under
subsection (a) of this section biennially on or before January 15 of the relevant
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 7 of 14
year to track progress toward meeting the vision and goals of this title. The
Secretary shall submit a report to the House Committee on Environment and
the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy regarding each
biennial update.
§ 4204. CONSERVATION PLAN
(a) On or before December 31, 2028, the Secretary, in consultation with the
Agency of Transportation, shall develop a draft plan to implement the
conservation goals of Vermont Conservation Design and to meet the vision and
goal established in section 4202 of this title. The plan shall be submitted for
review to the House Committee on Environment and the Senate Committee on
Natural Resources and Energy.
(b) The plan shall include:
(1) strategies for achieving the vision and goal of section 4202 of this
title, including identification of wildlife in need of protection and information
on their population distributions, habitat requirements, existing infrastructure
facilitating wildlife’s movement, limiting factors, and other pertinent
biological and ecological data on wildlife in need of protection;
(2) estimates of resources available for these strategies;
(3) plans for research and public education about landscape
connectivity, including habitat corridors and wildlife crossings;
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 8 of 14
(4) a strategy for achieving the vision and goal of section 4202 of this
title while continuing to conserve and protect Vermont’s agricultural land,
working forests, historic properties, recreational lands, and surface waters;
(5) the implementation methods for achieving the vision and goal of this
chapter using Vermont Conservation Design as a guide; and
(6) recommendations to implement the vision and goal of this chapter
while also enhancing the State of Vermont’s current investments and
commitments to working lands enterprises, rural landowners, and the broad
conservation mission implemented by the Secretary, including conservation of
agricultural land, working forests, historic properties, recreational lands, and
surface waters.
(c) In developing the plan, the Secretary, in consultation with the Secretary
of Transportation, shall hold 12 or more public meetings on the draft plan
between July 1, 2026 and December 31, 2027 to solicit input from
stakeholders. Stakeholders shall include private owners of forestlands and
agricultural lands, land trusts, animal advocacy organizations, conservation
organizations, environmental organizations, working lands enterprises, outdoor
recreation groups and municipalities, regional planning commissions,
conservation commissions, and relevant State and federal agencies. At least
three of the meetings shall be designed to solicit comments from the general
public.
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 9 of 14
§ 4205. HABITAT CORRIDOR CONSERVATION SPECIAL FUND
(a)(1) The Habitat Corridor Conservation Special Fund is established
pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 to fund increased landscape
connectivity in the State consistent with the conservation plan established
under section 4204 of this title. The Fund shall be administered by the
Secretary and shall consist of:
(A) revenue from the sale of Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamps
as provided for under section 4206 of this title;
(B) funds appropriated by the General Assembly;
(C) funds from public and private sources that the Secretary accepts
for the Fund;
(D) funds from federal government aid for State activities in
conservation, landscape connectivity, habitat corridors, or wildlife crossings;
and
(E) all interest earned on Fund balances.
(2) Amounts in the account shall carry over from year to year.
(b) The Secretary shall make expenditures from the Fund solely for
programs identified in the conservation plan established under section 4204 of
this title for the purposes of increasing landscape connectivity, including
through the development and maintenance of habitat corridors and wildlife
crossings. Expenditures consistent with the purposes of the plan may be made
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 10 of 14
under the terms of contracts with private organizations and groups.
Expenditures shall not exceed the monies available in the Fund.
(c) The Secretary may take appropriate actions to encourage taxpayers to
make contributions to the Habitat Corridor Conservation Special Fund,
including explaining the purposes of the Fund and the uses to which the Fund
has been or will be applied. The Secretary may solicit federal funds, grants,
and private contributions directed toward landscape connectivity. Any money
received by the Secretary from federal funds, grants, and private contributions
directed toward landscape connectivity shall be deposited in the Habitat
Corridor Conservation Special Fund.
§ 4206. HABITAT CORRIDOR CONSERVATION STAMP
(a) The Secretary shall be responsible for the contest, production,
procurement, distribution, and sale of the Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamp
and all marketable stamp by-products such as posters, artwork, calendars, and
other items. For the purposes of the contest, the Secretary may cooperate with
any reputable association, organization, or agency, and the Secretary may
designate any person found by the Secretary to be competent to facilitate such
contest.
(b) Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamps shall be sold at the direction of
the Secretary for a fee of $20.00. The Secretary shall deposit all revenue from
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 11 of 14
the sale of Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamps in the Habitat Corridor
Conservation Special Fund.
(c) There is created the Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamp Advisory
Committee to consult with and make recommendations to the Secretary
regarding all projects and activities supported by the Habitat Corridor
Conservation Special Fund. The Advisory Committee shall consist of five
persons and up to three alternates appointed by and serving at the pleasure of
the Secretary. The Secretary shall designate the Chair. The Secretary annually
shall report to the Advisory Committee with an accounting of the Habitat
Corridor Conservation Special Fund and the activities financed by the Fund.
§ 4207. HABITAT CORRIDOR CONSERVATION STAMP CONTEST
(a) The Secretary may authorize a contest for the design of the Habitat
Corridor Conservation Stamp. The Secretary may enter a contract or other
agreement with an entity to conduct the contest.
(b) The Secretary may authorize a fee to be charged for entry into the
contest. The revenue from any fee shall first be used to pay for the costs of the
contest. The Secretary shall deposit any revenue in excess of the costs of the
contest into the Habitat Corridor Conservation Special Fund.
§ 4208. TAKE PROHIBITION ON WILDLIFE CROSSINGS ACQUIRED
UNDER THIS CHAPTER
(a) Except as authorized under this chapter, a person shall not:
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 12 of 14
(1) take, possess, or transport wildlife that are within or entering a
wildlife crossing where the Secretary of Natural Resources or Secretary of
Transportation has prohibited the taking of wildlife; or
(2) injure, damage, erode, or waste the wildlife crossing.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section by knowingly
injuring wildlife within or entering a wildlife crossing or knowingly injuring,
damaging, eroding, or wasting a wildlife crossing and who is subject to
criminal prosecution under 13 V.S.A. chapter 81 may be required by the court
to pay restitution for:
(1) actual costs and related expenses incurred in treating and caring for
the wildlife by the person incurring these expenses, including the costs of
veterinarian services and Agency of Natural Resources staff time; or
(2) reasonable mitigation and restoration costs such as wildlife
restoration plans; habitat protection; and enhancement, transplanting,
cultivation, and propagation.
(c) The Secretary of Natural Resources or the Secretary of Transportation
may prohibit the taking of wildlife on or within a wildlife crossing.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
§ 5813. STATUTORY PURPOSES
* * *
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 13 of 14
(aa) The statutory purpose of the Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamp
credit in section 5830g of this title is to incentivize the sale of Habitat Corridor
Conservation Stamps to pay for increased landscape connectivity in the State.
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 5830g is added to read:
§ 5830g. CONSERVATION STAMP CREDIT
A resident individual or part-year resident individual who purchased
conservation stamps provided by the Secretary of Natural Resources shall be
entitled to a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5822 of
this title for the taxable year. The credit shall be equal to one-half of the cost
of any Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamps authorized under 10 V.S.A.
§ 4206 or any other stamp authorized by the Commissioner of Fish and
Wildlife to generate revenue for the Species and Habitat Conservation Fund
under 10 V.S.A. § 4047 that were purchased by the individual in the tax year.
The credit under this section shall not exceed $40.00 per tax year. For
purposes of this section, spouses filing jointly shall be considered an
individual.
Sec. 6. APPROPRIATIONS
(a) The sum of $25,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Fish and Wildlife in fiscal year 2026 to support public
education, which may cover the importance of landscape connectivity,
including habitat corridors and wildlife crossings, and outreach to encourage
VT LEG #378831 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.38
2025 Page 14 of 14
purchases of Habitat Corridor Conservation Stamps and other stamps
authorized by the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife and directed toward and
deposited in the Species and Habitat Conservation Fund under 10 V.S.A.
§ 4047.
(b) The sum of $125,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Secretary of Natural Resource in fiscal year 2026 to support the amenable land
inventory under 10 V.S.A. § 4203 and the conservation plan under 10 V.S.A.
§ 4204.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378831 v.1